apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

Ь2
А1 А2
Ы2
О1
%^О2
Е3
Г1 Г2
К1 К3
Н1
%^SLoss
%>

%<a%>   !
%<adv%>   !
%<cc%>   !
%<n%>   ! Имя существительное · Noun
%<pers%>   !
%<po%>   !
%<pron%>   !
%<v%>   !

%<pl%>   !
%<sg%>   !
%<def%>   !
%<indef%>   !
%<pxsg1%>   !
%<pxsg2%>   !
%<pxsg3%>   !
%<pxpl1%>   !
%<pxpl2%>   !
%<pxpl3%>   !

%<ela%>   !
%<gen%>   !
%<ill%>   !
%<ine%>   !
%<nom%>   !
%<prl%>   !

%<conj%>   !
%<cond%>   !
%<des%>   !
%<ind%>   !
%<imprt%>   !
%<opt%>   !

%<scsg1%>   !
%<scsg2%>   !
%<scsg3%>   !
%<scpl1%>   !
%<scpl2%>   !
%<scpl3%>   !

%<ocsg1%>   !
%<ocsg2%>   !
%<ocsg3%>   !
%<ocpl1%>   !
%<ocpl2%>   !
%<ocpl3%>   !

! Punctuation
%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)


!! flags
!! Flags used to identify parts of speech
@P.POS.PRON@
@P.POS.N@
@R.POS.N@
@P.POS.V@
@R.POS.V@
@C.POS@

!! Flags used with +Der/Pr nonverbal predication
@U.PRED.NO@
@U.PRED.YES@
@C.PRED@

!! Flags used with serial verbs
! INF = Infinitive
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@

! TX = tense
@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT1@
@U.CONJ-TX.PRT2@

! MX = mood
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@
@D.CONJ-MX.IND@ ! 2012-11-04 should this be _D_ or _N_
@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@
@U.CONJ-MX.OPT@
@U.CONJ-MX.DES@
@U.CONJ-MX.CONJ@
@U.CONJ-MX.COND@

! CONNEG = negation
@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@
@U.CONJ-CONNEG.NO@

! NX = number
@U.CONJ-NX.PL@
@U.CONJ-NX.SG@
! POSS = possessive person
@U.CONJ-POSS.1@
@U.CONJ-POSS.2@
@U.CONJ-POSS.3@
@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@
@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@


! PX = person
@U.CONJ-PX.1%0@
@U.CONJ-PX.12@
@U.CONJ-PX.13@
@U.CONJ-PX.15@
@U.CONJ-PX.16@
@U.CONJ-PX.2%0@
@U.CONJ-PX.21@
@U.CONJ-PX.23@
@U.CONJ-PX.24@
@U.CONJ-PX.26@
@U.CONJ-PX.3%0@
@U.CONJ-PX.31@
@U.CONJ-PX.32@
@U.CONJ-PX.33@
@U.CONJ-PX.34@
@U.CONJ-PX.35@
@U.CONJ-PX.36@

@U.CONJ-PX.4%0@
@U.CONJ-PX.42@
@U.CONJ-PX.43@
@U.CONJ-PX.45@
@U.CONJ-PX.46@

@U.CONJ-PX.5%0@
@U.CONJ-PX.51@
@U.CONJ-PX.53@
@U.CONJ-PX.54@
@U.CONJ-PX.56@

@U.CONJ-PX.6%0@
@U.CONJ-PX.61@
@U.CONJ-PX.62@
@U.CONJ-PX.63@
@U.CONJ-PX.64@
@U.CONJ-PX.65@
@U.CONJ-PX.66@

! Object conjugation
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@
@C.CONJ@
@P.TLOSS.ON@
@R.TLOSS.ON@

! nominals
@P.PossPx.Sg1@
@P.PossPx.Sg2@
@P.PossPx.Sg3@
@P.PossPx.Pl1@
@P.PossPx.Pl2@
@P.PossPx.Pl3@

@U.PossPx.S3@

@U.PossPx.Sg1@
@U.PossPx.Sg2@
@U.PossPx.Sg3@
@U.PossPx.Pl1@
@U.PossPx.Pl2@
@U.PossPx.Pl3@

@D.PossPx@
@C.PossPx@
!!Adding Tense 2006-12-04
@P.TNUM.SG@
@P.TNUM.PL@
@D.TNUM.SG@
@D.TNUM.PL@
@C.TNUM@

@P.TPERS.1@
@P.TPERS.2@
@P.TPERS.3@
@N.TPERS.1@
@N.TPERS.2@
@N.TPERS.3@
@U.TPERS.1@
@U.TPERS.2@
@U.TPERS.3@
@C.TPERS@

!!Cases
@N.CX.ILL@
@N.CX.ELA@
@N.CX.INE@
@N.CX.LAT@
@U.CX.ABL@
@U.CX.ELA@
@U.CX.ILL@
@U.CX.INE@
@U.CX.LAT@
@U.CX.LOC@
@U.CX.NOM@
@U.CX.PRL@
@U.CX.TRA@
@C.CX@

!!Dx number
@P.DNUM.PL@
@P.DNUM.SG@
@U.DNUM.PL@
@U.DNUM.SG@
@C.DNUM@

!!!!What are these?
!@P.PERS.1@
!@P.PERS.2@
!@P.PERS.3@
!@D.PERS.1@
!@D.PERS.2@
!@D.PERS.3@
!@N.PERS.1@
!@N.PERS.2@
!@N.PERS.3@
!@C.PERS@

!!
@P.NUM.SG@
@P.NUM.PL@
@D.NUM.SG@
@D.NUM.PL@
@C.NUM@

!These are used in INDEFinite-pronoun clitic determination
@P.INDEF.PREF@
@D.INDEF.PREF@
@R.INDEF.PREF@
@C.INDEF@

!! This allows or disallows combining with hyphen through loop
!! especially for acronyms 2012-11-04
@U.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@
@D.HYPH-COMBO.ACRO@
@C.HYPH-COMBO@


!! Linking vowel for use with Translative
! Present in pron-myv-morph.txt
@P.LV.ON@ 
@P.LV.OFF@ 
@R.LV.ON@ 
@U.LV.ON@ 
@D.LV.ON@ 
@C.LV@ 

! Removal
@C.CONJ-INF@
@C.CONJ-TX@
@C.CONJ-MX@
@C.CONJ-CONNEG@
@C.CONJ-NX@
@C.CONJ-PX@
@C.CONJ-POSS@

@C.KLOSS@
@C.TLOSS@

!! !!!FLAGS USED WITH COLLECTIVE NOUNS
!! !!number
@U.DECL-NX.SG@ !!≈ * @CODE@
@U.DECL-NX.PL@ !!≈ * @CODE@
@R.DECL-NX.PL@ !!≈ * @CODE@
!! !!case
@U.DECL-CX.NOM@
@U.DECL-CX.ACC@
@U.DECL-CX.GEN@
@U.DECL-CX.DAT@
@U.DECL-CX.ABL@
@U.DECL-CX.ILL@
@U.DECL-CX.INE@
@U.DECL-CX.ELA@
@U.DECL-CX.LAT@
@U.DECL-CX.LOC@
@U.DECL-CX.TRA@
@U.DECL-CX.PRL@
@U.DECL-CX.COM@
@U.DECL-CX.TEMP@
@U.DECL-CX.ABE@
@U.DECL-CX.CMP@

! declension type
@U.DECL-DX.DEF@
@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@
@U.DECL-DX.PX@

! predicate
!@U.DECL-PR.1@
!@C.DECL-PR@

!! Removal
@C.DECL-NX@
@C.DECL-DX@
@C.DECL-CX@



LEXICON Root
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Conjunctions ;
Nouns ; 
Postpositions ;
Pronouns ;
Quantifiers ;
Verbs ;
PERS ;
Punctuation ;

LEXICON A_КУДО
%<a%>: # ;
%<a%>%<der_n%>: NMN_КУДО ;

LEXICON A_КАЛ
%<a%>: # ;
%<a%>%<der_n%>: NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON A_ТИНГЕ
%<a%>:е # ;
%<a%>%<der_n%>: NMN_ТИНГЕ ;

LEXICON ADV-ILL
%<adv%>%<ill%>: # ;

LEXICON Conjunctions
ды CC ;
али:али CC  "" ;
бути:бути CS  "" ;
што:што CS  "" ;
да:да CC  "" ;
ды:ды CC  "ja" ;
или:или CC  "vai; tai" ;
коли:коли CS  "" ;
куш:куш CS  "" ;
но:но CC  "mutta" ;
а:а CC  "mutta, vaan; entä; ja" ;
хоть:хоть CS  "" ;
штобу:штобу CS  "" ;
эли:эли CC  "" ;


LEXICON N_КУДО
%<n%>:    NMN_КУДО    ;
    
LEXICON N_ПАНГО
%<n%>:    NMN_ПАНГО   ;
    
LEXICON N_УНДО
%<n%>:    NMN_УНДО    ;
    
LEXICON N_ПИЗЁЛКС
%<n%>:    NMN_ПИЗЁЛКС ;

LEXICON N_КАЛ
%<n%>:    NMN_КАЛ ;

LEXICON N_ОШ
%<n%>:    NMN_ОШ  ;

LEXICON N_ЛЕВКС
%<n%>:  NMN_ЛЕВКС   ;

LEXICON N_МЕКШ
%<n%>:  NMN_МЕКШ   ;

LEXICON N_ТЕШТЕ
%<n%>:  NMN_ТЕШТЕ   ;

LEXICON N_ТИНГЕ
%<n%>:  NMN_ТИНГЕ   ;

LEXICON N_КЕЖ
%<n%>:  NMN_КЕЖ   ;




LEXICON Postpositions
алдо PO-ABL ;
ало:ал PO_КАЛ-LOC  "" ;
эземс:эземс POSTP_  "asemesta, sijasta, sijaan, tilalle" ;
пингстэ:пингстэ Temp-1Arg-Ela  "" ;
икеле:икель PO_КАЛ-LOC  "" ;
ланга:ланга PO-IS-PRL  "pitkin, päällä; vasten" ;
лангсо:ланг PO_ПАНГО-INE3  "" ;
экшсэ:экш PO_ОШ-INE4  "" ;
ютксо:ютк jutkso-SPAT  "" ;
удало:удал PO_КАЛ-LOC  "" ;
ёно:ён PO_КАЛ-LOC  "" ;
потсо:потсо PO-IS-INE  "" ;
потсто:потсто PO-IS-ELA  "" ;
вельде:вельде POSTP_  "" ;
каршо:каршо Postp-karsho  "" ;
кис:кис POSTP_  "" ;
кисэ:кисэ POSTP_  "" ;
вакссо:вакс PO_ОШ-INE4  "" ;
коряс:коря PO_КУДО-ILL  "" ;
кувалма:кувалма POSTP_  "" ;
кувалт:кувалт POSTP_  "" ;
ладсо:ладсо POSTP_  "" ;
перька:перька PO-IS-PRL  "" ;
марто:марто marto-PO  "" ;
менгева:менгева POSTP_  "" ;
таркас:таркас POSTP_  "" ;
трокс:трокс POSTP_  "" ;
туртов:туртов Dat-1Arg  "" ;
эземс:эземс POSTP_  "" ;


LEXICON PO-ABL
%<po%>%<abl%>: # ;


LEXICON Pronouns
!эстензэ PRON-REFL-SG3-DAT ;

тензэ:те Dat-Pron  "hänelle" ;
эйзэнзэ:эйз Ill-Pron  "" ;
мекс:мекс PRON_  "miksi" ;
кона:кона PronRel-kona  "mikä" ;
мейсэ:мейсэ PRON_  "" ;


LEXICON VT_МУЕМС
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt1%>%<scsg3%>:сь # ;

LEXICON VT_ТЕЕМС
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt1%>%<scsg3%>:йсь # ;

LEXICON VT_ЧУВОМС
%<v%>%<ind%>%<prt1%>%<scsg3%>:сь # ;


!! ADJECTIVES

LEXICON A_RU-ОЙ
%<use_spellnosugg%>: A_КАЛ ;

LEXICON ABE-ADJ
%<der_abe%>: A_КУДО ;


LEXICON GEN-A ! The genitive is used as an attribute and predicate modifier
%<der_gen-indef%>: K ;
%<der_gen-indef%>: DER/PR4_OBL-SC3 ; ! These need checking 2012-04-17


LEXICON A_ВЕЙКЕТЬ-PL
 A_КИТ ;

LEXICON A_КИТ
%<a%>: K ;
%<a%>: DER/PR4_OBL ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation ;
!2013-03-15!%<a%>%<pl%>: _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 K ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КИТ ;
%<a%>:%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON A_ЛАК
%<a%>: K ;
%<a%>: DER/PR4_OBL ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation ;
!2013-03-15!%<a%>%<pl%>: _ЛАК-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 K ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ЛАК ;
%<a%>:%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON A_КАЛ_Sub
%<use_sub%>: A_КАЛ ;

LEXICON A_КАЛ
%<a%>: K ;
%<a%>: DER/PR4_OBL ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation ;
%<a%>%<pl%>: _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 K ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КАЛ ;
%<a%>:%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON A_ОШ
%<a%>: K ;
%<a%>: DER/PR4_OBL ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 _КИТ-NomPl-Conjugation ;
!2013-03-15!%<a%>%<pl%>: _КАЛ-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
%<a%>%<pl%>:%>тЬ2 K ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ОШ ;
%<a%>:%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON A_ТЕШТЕ
:О1 Adj-pango-tinge ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;
%<a%>:О1%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON A_ЧУВТО
:О1 Adj-pango-tinge ;
%<a%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_ПАНГО ;
%<a%>:О1%> N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON Adjectives
а% вейкеть:а% вейкеть A_ВЕЙКЕТЬ-PL  "" ;
акемевикс:акемевикс A_ОШ  "" ;
аракш:аракш A_ОШ  "" ;
безгуну:безгуну A_КУДО  "" ;
брезентовой:брезентовой A_RU-ОЙ  "" ;
бухляк:бухляк A_ЛАК  "" ;
валакавт:валакавт A_КИТ  "" ;
валмуевкшев:валмуевкшев A_КАЛ  "" ;
вейкеть:вейкеть A_ВЕЙКЕТЬ-PL  "" ;
вельдень:вельденZQZь GEN-A  "" ;
вере% сельме:вере% сельм A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
верек:верек A_ЛАК  "kostea; raaka" ;
визькстэме:визькстэме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
витаминтэме:витаминтэме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
вить:вить A_КИТ  "" ;
вишка:вишка A_КУДО  "pieni, pikkuinen" ;
гуйсельме:гуйсельм A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
двуличной:двуличной A_RU-ОЙ  "" ;
дошуж:дошуж A_ОШ  "" ;
здоровый:здоровый A_КАЛ  "" ;
зыянтомо:зыянтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
инфляционной:инфляционной A_RU-ОЙ  "" ;
кедстеме:кедстеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
келей-валаня:келей-валаня A_КУДО  "" ;
кендепеке:кендепек A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
кенерць:кенерць A_КАЛ  "" ;
конань:конань GEN-A  "" ;
коське:коськ A_ТИНГЕ  "kuiva" ;
кустарной:кустарной A_RU-ОЙ  "" ;
кучт:кучт A_КИТ  "" ;
лаказа:лаказа A_КУДО  "" ;
лезэв:лезэв A_КАЛ  "hyödyllinen" ;
летьке:летьк A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
лецяк:лецяк A_ЛАК  "" ;
лововикс:лововикс A_ОШ  "" ;
мезевтеме:мезевтеме ABE-ADJ  "" ;
мушкосювань:мушкосювань GEN-A  "" ;
надежный:надежный A_КАЛ  "" ;
нарумна:нарумна A_КУДО  "" ;
ордакш:ордакш A_ОШ  "" ;
пакорнай:пакорнай A_КАЛ  "" ;
пальтовтомо:пальтовтомо ABE-ADJ  "" ;
панарнэсэ:панарнэсэ A_КУДО  "" ;
пельсверек:пельсверек A_ЛАК  "" ;
передовой:передовой A_RU-ОЙ  "" ;
петь:петь A_КИТ  "" ;
плаштясельме:плаштясельм A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
рисьмесельме:рисьмесельм A_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
рунгопотмонь:рунгопотмонь GEN-A  "" ;
сивой:сивой A_RU-ОЙ  "" ;
совесттеме:совесттеме A_КУДО  "" ;
сталмов:сталмов A_КАЛ  "" ;
сэтьме:сэтьм A_ТИНГЕ  "hiljainen, rauhallinen" ;
сялговтовикс:сялговтовикс A_ОШ  "" ;
сёрмат-сёрмат:сёрмат-сёрмат A_КИТ  "" ;
тарть:тарть A_КИТ  "" ;
ташто:ташт A_ЧУВТО  "" ;
тосонь:тосонь GEN-A  "siellä oleva" ;
тусто:туст A_ЧУВТО  "tiheä, sankka, sakea, paksu" ;
тушто-ташто:тушто-ташт A_ЧУВТО  "" ;
целанек:целанек A_ЛАК  "" ;
циганонь:циганонь GEN-A  "" ;
чамора:чамора A_КУДО  "" ;
чарксей:чарксей A_КАЛ  "" ;
чевте:чевть A_ТЕШТЕ  "pehmeä" ;
чеев:ченгенг A_КАЛ_Sub  "" ;
чернильной:чернильной A_RU-ОЙ  "" ;
эрек:эрек A_ЛАК  "" ;
эриксэнь:эриксэнь GEN-A  "" ;
эрявт:эряфт A_КИТ  "" ;
юртомо:юртомо ABE-ADJ  "koditon; juureton" ;
явовикс:явовикс A_ОШ  "" ;
ёрок:ёрок A_ЛАК  "" ;
LEXICON Adverbs
тозонь ADV-ILL ;
LEXICON Nouns
валдо:валд N_УНДО ;
курго:кург N_УНДО ;
левкс N_ЛЕВКС ;
мекш N_МЕКШ ;
овто:овт N_УНДО ;
пизёлкс N_ПИЗЁЛКС ;
салмукс N_ПИЗЁЛКС ;
ундо:унд N_УНДО ;
чивалдо:чивалд N_УНДО ;
чувто:чувт N_УНДО ;
бабань% пеште:бабань% пешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
валпарго:валпарг N_ПАНГО  "" ;
валюта:валюта N_КУДО  "valuutta" ;
ведьбайге:ведь#байг N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
ведьпетнявкс:ведьпетнявкс N_ОШ  "" ;
векедь:векедь N_КАЛ  "" ;
губанпандо:губанпанд N_ПАНГО  "" ;
гулькаваце:гулькаваць N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
дураське:дураське N_КУДО  "" ;
заготовитель:заготовитель N_КАЛ  "" ;
ичевкс:ичевкс N_ОШ  "" ;
кальме:кальм N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
кельпарго:кель#парг N_ПАНГО  "" ;
керне:керне N_КУДО  "" ;
кинотеште:кинотешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
кирнявкс:кирнявкс N_ОШ  "" ;
киял:киял N_КАЛ  "" ;
кудораське:кудораськ N_ТИНГЕ  "perhe" ;
лавсяланго:лавсяланг N_ПАНГО  "" ;
лазпанкс:лазпанкс N_ОШ  "" ;
лайшиця:лайшиця N_КУДО  "itkevä, valittava; itkijä" ;
лём:лём N_КАЛ  "tuomi" ;
миртеште:миртешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
недляютко:недля#ютк N_ПАНГО  "" ;
пазекерьме:пазекерьм N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
палмань:палмань N_КАЛ  "pylväs, tolppa" ;
панармеште:панармешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
пелькс:пелькс N_ОШ  "" ;
пеняда:пеняда N_КУДО  "" ;
пештечувто:пеште#чувт N_ПАНГО  "" ;
прякиське:пря#киськ N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
псков:псков N_КАЛ  "" ;
пулотеште:пулотешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
скрипунпанго:скрипунпанг N_ПАНГО  "" ;
субтитра:субтитра N_КУДО  "" ;
суркс:суркс N_ОШ  "sormus" ;
сывельсэльге:сывельсэльг N_ТИНГЕ  "" ;
тутмапотмо:тутма#потм N_ПАНГО  "" ;
хирург:хирург N_КАЛ  "kirurgi" ;
чарытеште:чарытешть N_ТЕШТЕ  "" ;
эмпиризма:эмпиризма N_КУДО  "empirismi" ;
эрьге:эрьг N_ТИНГЕ  "helmi; herne" ;
ялгакс:ялгакс N_ОШ  "matkakumppani; aseveli; parillinen (jalkineista)" ;
